District of Columbia statutes.
31-2231.05

Defamation.

No person shall make, publish, disseminate, or circulate, directly or indirectly, or aid, abet, or encourage the making, publishing, disseminating or circulating, of an oral or written statement or a pamphlet, circular, article, or literature, which is false with respect to, maliciously critical of, or derogatory to, the financial condition of an insurer and which is calculated to injure the insurer.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-265, § 105, 48 DCR 1225